Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Administration.

Collateral references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 358et seq., 501-511.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 245-248.

Sec. 43.20.160.
Administration.

The department shall administer this chapter.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

The department shall prescribe and furnish all necessary forms, and adopt and publish all necessary regulations in plain and concise language conformable with this chapter for the assessment and collection of the taxes imposed by this chapter. The department shall apply as far as practicable the administrative and judicial interpretations of the federal income tax law. The department shall also prepare a concise statement of the contents of the code sections referred to in this chapter for the information of the taxpayer and make them available to the taxpayer making a return.

All money collected by the department under this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund of the state.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 14 ch 115 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1979; am § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 9 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning a taxpayer’s failure to file a timely return, see AS

43.05.245

.

Administrative Code. —

For corporate net income tax; special rules for financial organizations and, see 15 AAC 20, art. 6.

Sec. 43.20.170.
Collection of income tax at source. [Repealed, § 11 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.172.
Information required of fish processors and buyers. [Repealed, § 16 ch 82 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 43.20.173.
Collection of income tax at source for fish and fish products. [Repealed, § 1 ch 28 SLA 1965.]

Sec. 43.20.180.
Credits against tax. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.190.
Publicity. [Repealed, § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976.
For law on disclosure of tax returns and reports, see AS 43.05.230.]

Sec. 43.20.200.
Review and assessment.

As soon as practicable after a return is filed, the department may examine it and determine the correct amount of the tax. If an error is disclosed by the examination, the department shall so notify the taxpayer by first-class mail. The taxpayer may petition for redetermination of deficiency as provided in AS

43.05.240

.

The same period of limitation upon the assessment and collection of taxes imposed under this chapter and the same exceptions to it shall apply as provided in 26 U.S.C. 6501 — 6503 (Internal Revenue Code). In the case of additional tax due by reason of a modification, recomputation, or determination of deficiency in a taxpayer’s federal income tax return, the period of limitation on assessment commences from the date that the notice required in AS

43.20.030(d)

is filed, and if no notice is filed the tax may be assessed at any time.

History.

(§ 10 ch 115 SLA 1949; am § 10 ch 70 SLA 1975; am § 26 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 68 SLA 1987)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska law does not specifically provide for a method of assessment nor have any regulations been published concerning assessment. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

When used in connection with taxation, “assessment” is a process that fixes the liability of the taxpayer and ascertains the facts and furnishes the data for the proper preparation of the tax rolls. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

The Department of Revenue has established an internal administrative procedure for determining tax liability.
This procedure constitutes an “assessment” under the applicable general law, even though that procedure is not set out in the Income Tax Act or regulations promulgated by the Department of Revenue. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

“Assessment” is strictly an administrative determination that the person is indebted to the state for taxes due.
It is an official estimate, as determined from the return. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

The term “assessment” does not contemplate any billing or notice to the taxpayer. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

The date of assessment in Alaska is the date that the Department of Revenue, in the course of its normal administrative procedure, makes final the amount on which the attempt to collect the tax will be based.
It is the date the final amount of tax liability from which billing is to be made is listed on the tax ledger card. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

Under no interpretation can the date of billing be considered the date of assessment. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

Under
§§ 6501,
6502(a) and
6503(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, the assessment must be made within three years of filing date of the return and collection procedures must be started six years [now 10 years] after the date of the assessment.
1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

If the tax liability is placed on the ledger card within three years from the date of the filing of the return, collection of the tax is not barred by the statute of limitations. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

Sec. 43.20.210.
Additional penalty tax. [Repealed, § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976.
For civil penalty, see AS 43.05.220.]

Sec. 43.20.215.
Penalty for late payment of refund. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]